Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-3548
Temporary permit.

(1) An individual who holds a valid license to practice geology in another jurisdiction may apply to the board for a temporary permit.

(2) The board shall consider the following as evidence that an applicant is eligible for a temporary permit under this section:

(a) The applicant shall specify the project on which the applicant intends to practice geology;

(b) The applicant shall specify the length of time during which the applicant intends to practice geology for such project;

(c) The applicant submitted an application accompanied by the fee established by the board;

(d) The applicant has passed an examination on the statutes, rules, regulations, and other requirements unique to Nebraska; and

(e) The applicant submitted documentation of licensure as a licensed geologist in another jurisdiction.

(3) A temporary permit issued under this section is only valid for the project and for the length of time specified on the temporary permit.

(4) An individual who is issued a temporary permit under this section is subject to the Geologists Regulation Act.

(5) No right to practice geology beyond the project or the length of time specified on the temporary permit accrues to any holder of such permit.

(6) An individual shall not be issued more than one temporary permit under this section during such individual's lifetime.

Laws 2025, LB38, § 38.